California statutes. Public Contract Code
The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Monterey County Water Resources Agency, as provided for in the Monterey County Water Resources Agency Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1159, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21121.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, if the cost according to the estimate of the engineer, exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders.

(b) The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the agency.

(c) The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and
 published in the territory of the agency inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is entered into. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the agency.

(d) The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material in connection with the contract. The bonds shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and are
 subject to the provisions of that title.

(e) The board may reject any bid. The board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) All the projects are rejected.

(2) No proposals are received in response to the advertisement.

(3) The estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(4) The work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(f) The agency may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(g) The Monterey County Board of Supervisors may grant to the board of directors, appointed pursuant to Section 49 of the Monterey County Water Resources Agency Act (Chapter 1159 of the Statutes of 1990), any of the powers or duties granted to the Monterey County Board of Supervisors by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 62.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 80. Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21130. - 21131.]

21130.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 1949.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21131.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three placements in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract is made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the
 contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material in connection therewith, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board may reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement therefor, or where the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open market without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use
 in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work authorized and required under circumstances referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) This section does not apply to a contract entered into with the United States or the State of California or other governmental agency under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 2126 of the Statutes of 1959, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(e) The district may rent or otherwise contract for equipment with or without an operator and use it on works of the district, if the contract is approved by the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 63.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 81. Mendocino County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21140. - 21141.]

21140.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Mendocino County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 1949.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21141.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and
 upon the payment of the claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), or where the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the
 open market, without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract therefor to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 64.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 82. Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21150. - 21152.]

21150.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1275 of the Statutes of 1949.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), with or without the furnishing of materials or supplies, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. Construction of improvements or works shall not be staged to avoid the bidding process. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is
 made. The board shall invite the bids by publishing a notice of the call for bids pursuant to Section 6062 or 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to
 reject any bid. In the event the engineer’s estimate is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less, or in the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement therefor, or in the event the work consists of channel protection or maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may acquire in the open market without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 65.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21152.

If any change or addition in the work being performed under a construction contract pursuant to this section is deemed necessary, the board may authorize the contractor to proceed with the change or addition without the formality of obtaining bids therefor, provided that the extra cost to the district shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) when the total amount of the original contract does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), nor 10 percent of the amount of any original contract which exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The board may, by board order, authorize the Director of Public Works or other district officer to order such changes or additions in the work being performed, provided that the above conditions are satisfied and that the cost of the change or addition does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The authorization to the Director of Public Works or other district officer shall include the authority to grant any contract time extensions necessary in connection with the changes or additions. All changes or additions to the work shall be ordered in writing. If a change or addition in a contract awarded under the provisions of this section is requested by any person, firm, corporation, or public agency, other than the district, which person, firm, corporation, or public agency agrees to pay all of the cost of the change or addition, the board may, by board order, authorize the Director of Public Works or other district officer to direct the contractor to proceed with the change or addition without the formality of obtaining bids therefor, provided that the cost of the change or addition does not exceed 15 percent of the original contract price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 83. Santa Clara Valley Water District [21160. - 21163.]

21160.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Clara Valley Water District, as provided for in Chapter 1405 of the Statutes of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21160.5.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the board of directors of the Santa Clara Valley Water District.

(b) “District” means the Santa Clara Valley Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21161.

(a) For any improvement or unit of work done by district personnel, the estimated cost of the work shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), except under the following circumstances:

(1) The work consists of channel protection.

(2) The work consists of maintenance work as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22002.

(3) The work consists of environmental preservation or habitat management.

(4) The work consists of emergency work.

(b) With the approval of the board, in accordance with board policy that has been adopted in an open meeting, any improvement or unit of work not performed by district personnel and estimated by the engineer to cost in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be done by contract and shall comply with the following formal competitive bidding
 process:

(1) All contracts shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district.

(2) The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit for the whole thereof
 or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district.

(3) The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to that title.

(4) The board may reject any bid. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received
 pursuant to advertisement,
 or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, environmental preservation or habitat management, or emergency work, the board may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account.

(c) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). 

(d) The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(e) The provisions of this section requiring competitive bidding and the award of contracts to the lowest responsible bidder are inapplicable to the extent the improvement or
 unit of work is to be performed on its own facilities by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the California Public Utilities Commission.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the district may elect to participate in the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 264, Sec. 2.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21162.

Notwithstanding any other law, upon the approval of the board of directors, and without the approval of the board of supervisors, the district may use, for contracts for the construction of a building or buildings and improvements directly related to the construction of a building or buildings, the procedures described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) as that chapter reads on January 1, 2018, or as it may be amended after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 821, Sec. 3.   (AB 851)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21163.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) (A) “Anderson Dam project” or “project” means any activity or work of construction to retrofit, repair, replace, or improve the safety of the Leroy Anderson Dam and Reservoir, owned by the Santa Clara Valley Water District and located in the County of Santa Clara, including any upstream or downstream construction, improvements, changes in operational activities, and flood protection measures that may be required to implement that activity or work.

(B) The “Anderson Dam project” or “project” includes any avoidance, minimization, or mitigation measures, including the Coyote Creek-related Phase 1 measures of the Fish and
 Aquatic Habitat Collaborative Effort, as described in the settlement agreement, determined to be appropriate by the district, in consultation with state and federal agencies identified as “responsible agencies” or “trustee agencies” pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(2) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(3) “Best value contract” means a competitively bid contract entered into pursuant to this section.

(4) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for, or is awarded, a best value contract.

(5) “District” means the Santa Clara Valley Water District.

(6) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(7) “Settlement agreement” means the agreement entitled “Settlement Agreement Regarding Water Rights of the Santa Clara Valley Water District on Coyote, Guadalupe, and Stevens Creeks” initialed on May 27, 2003, by the district, the United States Department of the Interior, United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the United States Department of Commerce, National Marine Fisheries Service, the California Department of Fish and Game, the Guadalupe-Coyote Resource Conservation District, Trout Unlimited, the Pacific Coast Federation of Fishermen’s Associations, and California Trout, Incorporated.

(b) Upon the approval of the board, the district may award contracts on a best value basis for any work for the Anderson Dam project.

(c) If the board elects to award a contract on a best value basis pursuant to the authorization in subdivision (b), the district shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The district shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to adequately describe the district’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(2) The district shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify or short-list the entities, including subcontractors and suppliers, whose bids shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(A) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the district to evaluate bids, the procedure for final selection of the bidder, and any other information deemed necessary by the district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(B) Significant factors that the district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design-related expertise, construction expertise,
 acceptable safety records, and all other non-price-related factors.

(C) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the district. In preparing the standard template, the district may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies with experience awarding a contract on a best value basis. The template shall require all of the following information:

(i) If the bidder is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, composed of privately held entities, a listing of all of the shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(ii) Evidence that the members of the contracting team have completed, or demonstrated
 the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the bidder has the capacity to complete the project.

(iii) The licenses, registration, and credentials required for the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(iv) Evidence that establishes that the bidder has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(v) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(vi) An acceptable safety record. “Safety record” means the prior history concerning the safe performance of construction contracts. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s safety record shall include, at a minimum, its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period.

(vii) The information required under this subparagraph shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the bidder and its general partners or joint venture members.

(3) Bids shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the procurement process documents, including the request for qualifications, as specified in paragraphs (1) and (2), and the price.

(d) (1) An Anderson Dam project contractor shall not be prequalified, shortlisted, or awarded a contract, regardless of whether the best value process is used, unless the contractor provides an enforceable commitment to the district that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if either of the following requirements are met:

(A) The district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained
 workforce, and the contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 84. Napa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21170. - 21171.]

21170.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Napa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1449 of the Statutes of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21171.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the
 improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit for the whole thereof or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract as a unit or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid.

(b) In the event all proposals
 are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvements, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible
 bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 67.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 85. Lake County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21180. - 21182.]

21180.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Lake County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1544 of the Statutes of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21181.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call in the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be
 divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), or the work consists of channel protection,
 maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by the combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 68.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21182.

In case of an emergency, the board of supervisors shall respond to the emergency pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050) if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, first Sec. 65 (following Sec. 37).   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 86. Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21190. - 21191.]

21190.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1617 of the Statutes of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21191.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3247) of Title 15 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that chapter. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, first Sec. 66 (preceding Sec. 39).   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 86.5. Solano County Water Agency [21195. - 21196.]

21195.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Solano County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 573 of the Statutes of 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 906, Sec. 14.4.   Effective October 8, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 24 of Ch. 906.)
-------------------------------------------

21196.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of directors of the district shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract is made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the
 board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open
 market, without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(c) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of the Solano County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 69.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 87. Yolo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21200. - 21204.]

21200.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Yolo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1657 of the Statutes of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided, estimated to cost in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner as provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------